Illinois, session 104th, SB503.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Build Illinois Act is amended by changing 5Section 1-1 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 750/1-1)  (from Ch. 127, par. 2701-1)7    Sec. 1-1. This Act may be cited as the the Build Illinois 8Act.9(Source: P.A. 86-1475.)